Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 2. Concurrent Elections

§ 22-23-201.
Conduct; who may vote.

Except as provided in W.S.

22-23-202

municipal primary and general elections are held at the same time, in the same manner, at the same polling places, and are conducted by the same election officials, using the same poll lists, as the statewide primary and general elections.

Only voters residing in precincts within a municipality may vote in its elections.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-315; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

Cited

in

Karn v. Hayes, 530 P.2d 156,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(Wyo. 1975).

The 2015 amendment,

in (a), substituted “election officials” for “precinct officials”.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-23-202.
Optional mode of election for towns; procedures by charter ordinance.

Any municipality may, by charter ordinance enacted pursuant to article 13, section 1(c) of the Wyoming constitution, elect not to conduct its elections for office or for municipal ballot propositions in the same manner as statewide elections, in which case the charter ordinance shall at a minimum provide:

The manner in which notice of elections shall be given;

The procedure by which candidates shall be nominated for office, and by which vacancies in nomination are to be filled;

The date, time and place of the election which shall be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in the month of May every two (2) years;

The manner in which precinct officials and a canvassing board shall be appointed;

That the municipal clerk is responsible for:

Determining if a person seeking nomination is a qualified candidate;

Preparing the ballots in substantially the same form as the general election nonpartisan ballot;

Designating polling places;

Otherwise conducting the election.

That the municipality shall bear the expense of the election;

The manner in which election results are certified and persons receiving the highest number of votes are notified.

Those matters not otherwise provided for in a charter ordinance shall be governed by chapters 1 through 21, 23, 25 and 26 of this Election Code.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-315.1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

§ 22-23-203.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, provided that electors at municipal elections would be subject to challenge.

§ 22-23-204.
Certification and printing of ballot propositions.

A municipal ballot proposition to be voted on at a general election shall be certified by the municipal clerk to the county clerk not less than sixty (60) days before the general election and shall be printed on the municipal ballot by the county clerk unless state law provides otherwise.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-22.1-319; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.